Washington statutes.
RCW 15.49.005

Purpose—Rules.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide uniformity and consistency in the packaging of agricultural, vegetable, and flower seeds so as to facilitate the interstate movement of seed, to protect consumers, and to provide a dispute-resolution process. The department of agriculture is hereby authorized to adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW to implement this chapter. To the extent possible, the department shall seek to incorporate into the rules provisions from the recommended uniform state seed law in order to attain consistency with other states.

[ 1989 c 354 s 70.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 354 ss 70-81 and 84-86: "Sections 70 through 81 and 84 through 86 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1990." [ 1989 c 354 s 88.]

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.